Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2604
Commission; functions.

The functions of the commission are to:

(1) Promote state and federal legislation beneficial to the African American community in Nebraska;

(2) Coordinate new and existing programs relating to the African American community in Nebraska regarding key opportunities including, but not limited to, housing, education, employment, economic development, law and order, and related themes;

(3) Work with other state and federal government agencies and federal and state elected officials in the development of programs in areas mentioned in subdivision (2) of this section;

(4) Keep the Governor's office apprised of the situation in the African American community in Nebraska;

(5) Administer sections 81-2601 to 81-2607;

(6) Provide the public with information and education relevant to African American affairs in Nebraska; and

(7) Develop initiatives to encourage the total involvement of African American people in activities for the common benefit of the African American community.

Laws 2020, LB918, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB69, § 4.